South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3557.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.A.   Section 7-11-15 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 7-11-15.   (A) In order to qualify as a candidate to run in the general election, all candidates seeking nomination by political party primary or political party convention must file a statement of intention of candidacy and party pledge and submit any filing fees between noon on March sixteenth and noon on March thirtieth twenty-fifth as provided in this section. If March sixteenth is on a Saturday or Sunday, then the time for filing begins at noon on the next business day. If March thirtieth twenty-fifth is on a Saturday or Sunday, then the time for filing extends to noon on the next regular business day. For purposes of this section and Section 7-13-45, "next regular business day" means a day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, candidates seeking nomination for a statewide, congressional, or district office that includes more than one county must file their statements of intention of candidacy, and party pledge and submit any filing fees with the State Election Commission. (2) Candidates seeking nomination for the State Senate or House of Representatives must file their statements of intention of candidacy and party pledge and submit any filing fees with the State Election Commission or county board of voter registration and elections in the county of their residence. The state executive committees must certify candidates pursuant to Section 7-13-40. (3) Candidates seeking nomination for a countywide or less than countywide office shall file their statements of intention of candidacy and party pledge and submit any filing fees with the county board of voter registration and elections in the county of their residence. (B) All candidates seeking nomination by political party primary or political party convention for a general election or special election must pay a filing fee equal to one percent of the total salary for the term of the applicable office, or one hundred dollars, whichever is greater. The filing fees for the candidates, except filing fees for candidates for municipal office, must be transmitted by the respective political parties to the State Election Commission and placed by its executive director in an account designated for use in conducting elections. A lieutenant governor candidate is not required to pay a filing fee. (C) Political parties may charge a certification fee of up to one hundred dollars to candidates seeking nomination for a general election. To implement a certification fee, a political party's state executive committee must notify the executive director of the State Election Commission of its decision to charge the fee, and the amount of the fee, no later than December first of the year preceding a general election. A certification fee must be submitted with the filing fee and retained by the applicable political party. A lieutenant governor candidate is not required to pay a certification fee. (B)(D) Except as provided in this section, the State Election Commission and county board boards of voter registration and elections with whom the documents in subsection (A) are filed must provide a copy of all statements of intention of candidacy, the party pledge, receipt, and filing fees, to the appropriate political party executive committee within two days following the deadline for filing. If the second day falls on Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday, the statement of intention of candidacy, party pledge, and filing fee must be filed by noon the following day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday. A candidate's name may not appear on a primary election ballot, convention slate of candidates, general election ballot, or special election ballot, except as otherwise provided by law, if (1) the candidate's statement of intention of candidacy and party pledge has not been filed with the county board of voter registration and elections or State Election Commission, as the case may be, as well as any filing fee, by the deadline and (2) the candidate has not been certified by the appropriate political party as required by Sections 7-13-40 and 7-13-350, as applicable. The candidate's name must appear if the candidate produces the signed and dated copy of his timely filed statement of intention of candidacy. An error or omission by a person seeking to qualify as a candidate pursuant to this section who is not directly related to a constitutional or statutory qualification for that office must be construed in a manner that favors the person's access to the ballot. (C)(E) The statement of intention of candidacy required in this section and in Section 7-13-190(B) must be on a form designed and provided by the State Election Commission. This form, in addition to all other information, must contain an affirmation that the candidate meets, or will meet by the time of the general election, or as otherwise required by law, the qualifications for the office sought. The candidate or his agent must file a signed statement of intention of candidacy and the election commission with whom it is filed must stamp the statement with the date and time received, keep the original statement, provide a copy to the candidate, and provide a copy to the appropriate political party executive committee. (D)(F) The candidate or his agent must file a signed party pledge, as required pursuant to Section 7-11-210, and the election commission with which it is filed must stamp the party pledge with the date and time received, provide a copy to the candidate, and provide a copy to the appropriate political party executive committee. (E)(G) The election commission with which the filing fee is filed must issue a receipt for the filing fee, stamp the receipt with the date and time the filing fee was received, provide a copy to the candidate or his agent, and provide a copy to the appropriate political executive party. The filing fee must be made payable to the appropriate political party. (F)(H) If, after the closing of the time for filing the documents required pursuant to this section, there are not more than two candidates for any one office and one or more of the candidates dies, or withdraws, then the state or county committee, as the case may beapplicable, if the nomination is by political party primary or political party convention only may, in its discretion, afford an opportunity for the entry of other candidates for the office involved, provided the Executive Director of the State Election Commission confirms there is sufficient time for other candidates to be placed on the ballot; however, for the office of State House of Representatives or State Senator, the discretion must be exercised by the state committee. (1) In order for a state or county committee to allow entry of other candidates for the office, the committee must: (a) hold a public hearing within forty-eight hours of the death or withdrawal of the candidate or candidates; and (b) publicly vote to allow reopening of the time to file for the office. (2) The additional filing period for the office shall consist of three business days following the vote authorizing reopening of the time to file. (3) Any withdrawal must be in writing to the director of the county board of voter registration and elections in which the candidate filed, or to the Executive Director of the State Election Commission if the candidate filed with the State Election Commission. (G)(I) The county chairman of a political party and the chairman of the state executive committee of a political party may designate a person to observe the filings made at the election commission pursuant to this section. (H)(J) The provisions of this section do not apply to nonpartisan school trustee elections in a school district where local law provisions provide for other dates and procedures for filing statements of candidacy or petitions, and to the extent the provisions of this section and the local law provisions conflict, the local law provisions control. B.   This SECTION takes effect on January 1, 2027. SECTION 2.A.   Section 7-11-210 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 7-11-210.   (A) Every candidate for selection as a nominee of any political party for any state office, United States Senator, member of Congress, or solicitor, to be voted for in any party primary election or political party convention, shall file with and place in the possession of the appropriate election commission, pursuant to Section 7-11-15, by twelve o'clock noon on March thirtieth a party pledge in the following form, the blanks being properly filled in and the party pledge signed by the candidate: "I hereby file my notice as a candidate for the nomination as ___________ in the primary election or convention to be held on ___________ . I affiliate with the ___________ Party, and I hereby pledge myself to abide by the results of the primary or convention. I shall not authorize my name to be placed on the general election ballot by petition and will not offer or campaign as a write-in candidate for this office or any other office for which the party has a nominee. I authorize the issuance of an injunction upon ex parte application by the party chairman, as provided by law, should I violate this pledge by offering or campaigning in the ensuing general election for election to this office or any other office for which a nominee has been elected in the party primary election, unless the nominee for the office has become deceased or otherwise disqualified for election in the ensuing general election. I hereby affirm that I meet, or will meet by the time of the general or special election, or as otherwise required by law, the qualifications for this office". (B) Every candidate for selection in a primary election as the nominee of any political party for member of the Senate, member of the House of Representatives, and all county and township offices shall file, pursuant to Section 7-11-15, with and place in the possession of the county board of voter registration and elections of the county in which they reside by twelve o'clock noon on March thirtieth a like party pledge. (C) The party pledge required by this section to be filed by a candidate in a primary must be signed personally by the candidate, and the signature of the candidate must be signed in the presence of an individual authorized by the election commission director. Any party pledge of any candidate signed by an agent on behalf of a candidate shall not be valid. (D) In the event that a person who was defeated as a candidate for nomination to an office in a party's primary election shall thereafter offer or campaign as a candidate against any nominee for election to any office in the ensuing general election, the state chairman of the party which held the primary (if the office involved is one voted for in the general election by the electors of more than one county), or the county chairman of the party which held the primary (in the case of all other offices), shall forthwith institute an action in a court of competent jurisdiction for an order enjoining the person from so offering or campaigning in the general election, and the court is hereby empowered upon proof of these facts to issue an order. B.   This SECTION takes effect on January 1, 2027. SECTION 3.A.   Section 7-13-15 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 7-13-15.   (A) This section does not apply to municipal primaries. (B) Except as provided in subsection (A) or unless otherwise specifically provided for by statute or ordinance, the following primaries must be conducted by the State Election Commission and the county boards of voter registration and elections on the second Tuesday in June of each general election year: (1) primaries for federal offices, excluding a presidential preference primary for the Office of President of the United States as provided pursuant to Section 7-11-20(B); and (2) primaries for: (a) state offices; (b) offices including more than one county; (c) countywide and less than countywide offices, specifically including, but not limited to, all school boards and school trustees; and (d) special purpose district offices, which include, but are not limited to, water, sewer, fire, soil conservation, and other similar district offices. (C) Filing fees received from candidates filing to run in primary elections may be retained and expended by the State Election Commission to pay for the conduct of primary elections. Any balance in the filing fee accounts or in the primary and general election accounts as of each June thirtieth may be carried forward in these accounts to the succeeding fiscal year and must be expended for the same purposes. B.   This SECTION takes effect on January 1, 2027. SECTION 4.A.   Section 7-13-40 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 7-13-40.   In the event that a party nominates candidates by party primary, a party primary must be held by the party and conducted by the State Election Commission and the respective county boards of voter registration and elections on the second Tuesday in June of each general election year, and a second and third primary each two weeks successively thereafter, if necessary. Written certification of the names of all candidates to be placed on primary ballots must be made by the political party chairman, vice chairman, or secretary to the State Election Commission or the county board of voter registration and elections whichever is responsible under law for preparing the ballot, not later than twelve o'clock noon on April fifth, or if April fifth falls on a Saturday or Sunday, not later than twelve o'clock noon on the following Monday. Political parties nominating candidates by party primary must verify the qualifications of those candidates prior to certification to the appropriate election commission of the names of candidates to be placed on primary ballots. The written verification required by this section must contain a statement that each candidate certified meets, or will meet by the time of the general election, or as otherwise required by law, the qualifications for office for which he has filed. A political party must not certify any candidate who does not or will not by the time of the general election, or as otherwise required by law, meet the qualifications for the office for which the candidate has filed, and such candidate's name shall not be placed on a primary ballot. The filing fees for all candidates filing to run in all primaries, except municipal primaries, must be transmitted by the respective political parties to the State Election Commission and placed by the executive director of the commission in a special account designated for use in conducting primary elections and must be used for that purpose. The filing fee for each office is one percent of the total salary for the term of that office or one hundred dollars, whichever amount is greater. B.   This SECTION takes effect on January 1, 2027. SECTION 5.A.   Section 7-13-190 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 7-13-190.   (A) Except as otherwise provided in this code as to specific offices, whenever a vacancy occurs in office by reason of death, resignation, or removal and the vacancy in office is one which is filled by a special election to complete the term of office, this section applies. (B)(1) In partisan elections, whether seeking nomination by political party primary or political party convention, filing by these candidates shall open for the office at twelve o'clock noon on the third Friday after the vacancy occurs for a period to close eight seven days later at twelve o'clock noon. If the filing period closes on a legal holiday, then the filing period is extended until noon on the next weekday that is not a legal holiday. If seeking nomination by petition, the petitions must be submitted not later than twelve o'clock noon, sixty days prior to the election. Verification of these petitions must be made not later than twelve o'clock noon forty-five days prior to the election. If seeking nomination by political party primary or political party convention, filing with the appropriate official is the same as provided in Section 7-11-15 and if seeking nomination by petition, filing with the appropriate official is the same as provided in Section 7-11-70. (2) A primary must be held on the first eligible date provided in subsection (D) that is on or following the eleventh Tuesday after the vacancy occurs. A runoff primary, if necessary, must be held on the thirteenth Tuesday after the vacancy occurstwo weeks after the primary. TheA special election must be held on the twentieth Tuesday after the vacancy occursfirst eligible date provided in subsection (D) that is following the date of the primary. If the twentieth Tuesday after the vacancy occurs is no more than sixty days prior to the general election, the special election must be held on the same day as the general election. If the filing period closes on a state holiday, then filing must be held open through the succeeding weekday. If the date for an election falls on a state holiday, the election must be set for the next succeeding Tuesday. For purposes of this section, state holiday does not mean the general election day. (3) If there are more than twenty Tuesdays after a vacancy occurs in the office of House of Representatives of the Congress of the United States to the date provided for an eligible special election in subsection (D), or if there are more than thirty-five days from the eleventh Tuesday after a vacancy occurs in the office of State Senate or State House of Representatives to the date provided for an eligible primary in subsection (D), then the schedule to fill a vacancy in one of those offices must be in accordance with the following: (a) a primary must be held on the eleventh Tuesday after the vacancy occurs; (b) a runoff primary, if necessary, must be held two weeks after the primary; (c) a special election must be held on the twentieth Tuesday after the vacancy occurs; and (d) if the date for a primary, runoff primary, or special election conflicts with the holding of a statewide primary, statewide general election, or presidential preference primary then the Governor, President of the Senate, or Speaker of the House of Representatives, as applicable, may establish a schedule to fill a vacancy in a manner that does not conflict with the holding of a statewide primary, statewide general election, or presidential preference primary. (C) If the office is not one for which there are partisan elections, then the filing must be opened at noon on the third Friday after the vacancy occurs for a period to close ten seven days later at noon. If the filing period closes on a legal holiday, then the filing period is extended until noon on the next weekday that is not a legal holiday. The filing must be made to the same entity to which the nonpartisan officeholders would normally file for office in a general election year. The election must be set for the first eligible date provided in subsection (D) that is on or following the thirteentheleventh Tuesday after the vacancy occurs. Both the filing date and the election date are subject to the provisions in subsection (B) of this section regarding holidays. (D) Provided, however, if a vacancy occurs in more than one office in the same county requiring separate special elections to be held within a period of twenty-eight days under the provisions of this section, the county board of voter registration and elections or other authority responsible for the conduct of the elections shall conduct all of the elections on the same date. The special elections must be held on the latest date required for an election during the twenty-eight-day period.A special election for any office, a primary for a special election, or for any matter for which a special election is called, unless otherwise provided in this section, must only be held on one of the following dates: (1) the fourth Tuesday in January; (2) the first Tuesday after the first Monday in April; (3) the second Tuesday in June in even-numbered years only and for only primaries for special elections; (4) the fourth Tuesday in August; and (5) the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November for only elections other than primaries for special elections. (E) If the date for a primary for a special election, runoff primary, or special election falls on a legal holiday, then the primary, runoff primary, or special election, as applicable, must be set for the next succeeding Tuesday that is not a legal holiday. (F) If the date for a special election to fill an unexpired term of office is one hundred days or less from the date a general election is to be held for the office, then no special election or primary must be held for the office. The provision of this subsection is not applicable to unexpired terms in the office of House of Representatives of the Congress of the United States. B.   This SECTION takes effect on July 1, 2026, and is applicable to vacancies created on and after July 1, 2026. SECTION 6.   If any section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, phrase, or word of this act is for any reason held to be unconstitutional or invalid, such holding shall not affect the constitutionality or validity of the remaining portions of this act, the General Assembly hereby declaring that it would have passed this act, and each and every section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, phrase, and word thereof, irrespective of the fact that any one or more other sections, subsections, paragraphs, subparagraphs, sentences, clauses, phrases, or words hereof may be declared to be unconstitutional, invalid, or otherwise ineffective. SECTION 7.   Notwithstanding another provision of law, a special election required to fill a vacancy created on March 17, 2026, must be held on June 9, 2026. SECTION 8.   Except as otherwise provided in this act, this act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----